Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-260
Home barber services permit; renewal; revocation or expiration; effect.

Each home barber services permit shall be subject to renewal at the same time as the barber shop license and shall be renewed upon request of the permitholder if the barber shop is operating its home barber services in compliance with the Barber Act and if the barber shop license is renewed. No permit that has been revoked or expired may be reinstated or transferred to another owner or location.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 30.